src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON DIBME !!= @CODE@ ! even and contracted
                 :dibme%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                 :dibme%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 :dibme%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
      +Use/-Spell:d          ABBO/AMOS         ;
        +Cmp/SgGen:dibme%>Q1  R                 ;
        +Cmp/PlGen:dibme%>Q1j R                 ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:dibme%>Q1t ENDLEX            ;


LEXICON LIS !!= @CODE@ ! Handlernomen på -is?
                        :%>     ATTR                     ;
                 +Sg+Nom:%>     ENDLEX                   ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>    PxV                      ; !
               +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R                        ;
               +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R                        ;
                    +Ess:a%>n   ENDLEX                   ;
                        :a%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM-OTHadj    ;
                        :a%>    ILL-EVENCASEadj          ;
                        :a%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM-SG-COMadj ;
! : VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR


LEXICON LÁGÁSJ !!= @CODE@
     +A+Attr:%>   ENDLEX         ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R              ;
 +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R              ;
          +A:     VUOHTA         ;
          +A:%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
          +A:%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
  -+Use/Circ:#%-  ProperNoun     ; ! ! Definitely circular x 35000.


LEXICON AGAdj !!= @CODE@ ! denominal derivations go here
     +A+Attr:%>   ENDLEX         ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R              ;
 +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R              ;
      +A+Attr:     VUOHTA         ;
          +A:%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
          +A:%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;

LEXICON Ahkásasj !!= @CODE@ ! lexicalized and denominal -asj derivations
     +A+Attr:%>     ENDLEX        ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R             ;
 +A+Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R             ;
   +A+Sg+Nom:%>     ENDLEX        ;
          +A:a%>    ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN ;
          +A:       VUOHTA        ;


LEXICON STÁVVAL !!= @CODE@ ! OK& Kintel: stávval attr stávvalis, also as second compound
     +A+Attr:is%> ENDLEX         ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>a    R              ;
 +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij   R              ;
          +A:%>Q1   VUOHTA         ;
          +A:%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
          +A:%>     OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
