src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
alkoholvigák+CmpNP/None:alkohol#vigág9 AGAdj ; !
alkohåvllåvigák+CmpNP/None:alkohåvllå#vigág9 AGAdj ; !
allabåskak+CmpNP/None:alla#båskag9 AGAdj ;
allamáttok+CmpNP/None:allamáttog9 AGAdj ; !
anársámegielak+CmpNP/None:anársámegielak AGAdj ;
asmelbelak+CmpNP/None:asmelbelag9 AGAdj ; !
avtabelak+CmpNP/None:avtabelag9 AGAdj ;
avtagerdak+CmpNP/None:avtagerdag9 AGAdj ;
avtagielak+CmpNP/None:avtagielag9 AGAdj ; !
avtalágásj+CmpNP/None:avtalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
avtalåssåk+CmpNP/None:avta#låssåg9 AGAdj ; !
avtamielak+CmpNP/None:avtamielag9 AGAdj ; !
avtatraják+CmpNP/None:avtatrajág9 AGAdj ;
badjelasj+CmpNP/None:badjeladtj Ahkásasj ;
bahájuonak+CmpNP/None:bahájuonag9 AGAdj ; !
bahámielak+CmpNP/None:bahámielag9 AGAdj ; !
baskuk+CmpNP/Last:baskug9 AGAdj ;
bavlak+CmpNP/Last:bavlag9 AGAdj ; !Kintel: bavlak. -k der coming from noun bavlle
bavlak+Err/Orth+CmpNP/Last:bavhlag9  AGAdj ; !OK: bavhlak. This -vhl- cons.centre is not found elsewhere, thus assuming this is a typo since Kintel: bavlak
biellebálduk+CmpNP/None:biellebáldug9 AGAdj ; !
biellebáldukgielak+CmpNP/None:biellebáldukgielag9 AGAdj ; ! ???
buorreluonduk+CmpNP/None:buorreluondug9 AGAdj ; !
buorrelágásj+CmpNP/None:buorrelágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
buorremielak+CmpNP/None:buorremielag9 AGAdj ; !
buorrenálak+CmpNP/None:buorrenálag9 AGAdj ; !
buorrenálán+CmpNP/None:buorre#nálán AGAdj ;
bájnnovának+CmpNP/None:bájnnovánag9 AGAdj ; !
bálásj+CmpNP/None:bálátj LÁGÁSJ ;
bávtak+CmpNP/Last:bávtag9 AGAdj ;
båvnåk+CmpNP/Last:båvnåg9 AGAdj ;
dijmásj+CmpNP/None:dijmátj LÁGÁSJ ;
dálásj+CmpNP/None:dálátj LÁGÁSJ ; 
dárogielak+CmpNP/None:dárogielag9 AGAdj ; !
dålusj+CmpNP/None:dålutj LÁGÁSJ ; !
dæddostávval:dæddo^stávval STÁVVAL ;
galmmavarák+CmpNP/None:galmmavarág9 AGAdj ; !
gasskadásek+CmpNP/None:gasskadáseg9 AGAdj ;
gasskasjattuk:gasska#sjattuk AGAdj ;
gengalágásj+CmpNP/None:gengalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
geŋgalágásj+CmpNP/None:geŋgalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
giehppismielak+CmpNP/None:giehppismielag9 AGAdj ; !
giehtabelak+CmpNP/None:giehtabelag9 AGAdj ; !
gielak+CmpNP/Last:gielag9 AGAdj ;
gilduk+CmpNP/Last:gildug9 AGAdj ;
guhkajuolgak+CmpNP/None:guhkajuolgag9 AGAdj ; !
guhkarájak+CmpNP/None:guhkarájag9 AGAdj ;
guhkasasák+CmpNP/None:guhkasaság9 AGAdj ;
guhkatjuvdak+CmpNP/None:guhkatjuvdag9 AGAdj ; !
guhkavuoptak+CmpNP/None:guhkavuoptag9 AGAdj ; !
guhkesmielak+CmpNP/None:guhkesmielag9 AGAdj ; !
guovtebelak+CmpNP/None:guovtebelag9 AGAdj ;
guovtegerdak:guovtegerdag9 AGAdj ;
guovtegielak+CmpNP/None:guovtegielag9 AGAdj ; !
guovtegávnak+CmpNP/None:guovtegávnag9 AGAdj ; !
guovtelágásj+CmpNP/None:guovtelágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
guovtemuoduk+CmpNP/None:guovte#muodug9 AGAdj    ;
guovterájak+CmpNP/None:guovterájag9 AGAdj ;
guovtesjervak+CmpNP/None:guovtesjervag9 AGAdj ; !
guovtestávval:guovte^stávval STÁVVAL ;
guovtesuorak+CmpNP/None:guovtesuorag9 AGAdj ; !
guovteájvuk+CmpNP/None:guovte#ájvug9 AGAdj ;
gájkkalágásj+CmpNP/None:gájkkalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
gájklágásj+CmpNP/None:gájk#lágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
gájmarmielak+CmpNP/None:gájmarmielag9 AGAdj ; !
gålguk+CmpNP/Last:gålgug9 AGAdj ; !
gålmågerdak+CmpNP/None:gålmågerdag9 AGAdj ;
gålmåtjiegak:gålmåtjiegag9 AGAdj ;
gåmbek+CmpNP/Last:gåmbeg9 AGAdj ;
gårogiedak+CmpNP/None:gårogiedag9 AGAdj ; !
hebalk+Area/SE+CmpNP/Last:hebalg9 AGAdj ;
iemelágásj+CmpNP/None:iemelágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
iesjgeŋgalágásj+CmpNP/None:iesjgeŋgalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
iesjguhtiklágásj+CmpNP/None:iesjguhtiklágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
iesjmuoduk+CmpNP/None:iesj#muodug9 AGAdj ; !
iesjrádak+CmpNP/None:iesj#rádag9 AGAdj ; !
iesjráduk+CmpNP/None:iesj#rádug9 AGAdj ; !
iesjåjvak+CmpNP/None:iesjåjvag9 AGAdj ; !
ietjasåjvak+CmpNP/None:ietjas#åjvag9 AGAdj ; !
ietjálágásj+CmpNP/None:ietjálágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
ieŋŋilsgielak+CmpNP/None:ieŋŋils#gielak AGAdj ;
ihttásj+CmpNP/None:ihttátj LÁGÁSJ ;
jagák+CmpNP/Last:jagág9 AGAdj ; !
jagásj+CmpNP/None:jagátj LÁGÁSJ ;
juogalágásj+CmpNP/None:juogalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
juohkkalágásj+CmpNP/None:juohkkalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
juoŋgalágásj+CmpNP/None:juoŋgalágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
juoŋgamuoduk+CmpNP/None:juoŋga#muodug9 AGAdj    ;
klássak+CmpNP/Last:klássag9 AGAdj ;
leruk+CmpNP/Last:lerug9 AGAdj ; !
lieggavarák+CmpNP/None:lieggavarág9 AGAdj ; !
lágásj+CmpNP/Last:lágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
lågenanguovtenástak+CmpNP/None:lågenan#guovte#nástag9 AGAdj ;
majoritiehttagielak+CmpNP/None:majoritiehtta#gielag9 AGAdj ;
moattebelak+CmpNP/None:moatte#belag9 AGAdj ;
moattebuolvak+CmpNP/None:moatte#buolvag9 AGAdj ;
moattegerdak+CmpNP/None:moatte#gerdag9 AGAdj ;
moattegielak+CmpNP/None:moatte#gielag9 AGAdj ; !
moattelágásj+CmpNP/None:moattelágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
moattetjerdak+CmpNP/None:moatte#tjerdag9 AGAdj ;
moattetjiegak+CmpNP/None:moattetjiegag9 AGAdj ;
muodogehtjak+CmpNP/None:muodogehtjag9 AGAdj ; !
muoduk+CmpNP/Last:muodug9 AGAdj    ;
muovek+CmpNP/Last:muoveg9 AGAdj ;
muttáklágásj+CmpNP/None:muttáklágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
mánájdásek+CmpNP/None:mánájdáseg9 AGAdj ;
namák+CmpNP/Last:namág9 AGAdj ; !
nieljegerdak+CmpNP/None:nieljegerdag9 AGAdj ;
nieljetjiegak+CmpNP/None:nieljetjiegag9 AGAdj ;
nuorajdásek+CmpNP/None:nuorajdáseg9 AGAdj ;
oastok+CmpNP/Last:oastog9 AGAdj ;
rievtesmielak+CmpNP/None:rievtes#mielag9 AGAdj ; !
ruossjagielak+CmpNP/None:ruossja#gielak AGAdj ;
rájnnavájmuk+CmpNP/None:rájnnavájmug9 AGAdj ; !
savvok+CmpNP/Last:savvog9 AGAdj ;
sierralágásj+CmpNP/None:sierralágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
sjanjak+CmpNP/Last:sjanjag9  AGAdj ;
sjájak+CmpNP/Last:sjájag9  AGAdj ;
sniebak+CmpNP/Last:sniebag9 AGAdj ;
spihtjagielak+CmpNP/None:spihtja#gielag9 AGAdj ;
stuorsjattuk+CmpNP/None:stuorsjattug9 AGAdj ; !
suohkkisvuoptak+CmpNP/None:suohkkisvuoptag9 AGAdj ; !
suomagielak+CmpNP/None:suomagielag9 AGAdj ; !
sámegielak+CmpNP/None:sámegielag9 AGAdj ; !
sæmmilágásj+CmpNP/None:sæmmilágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
sæmmálágásj+CmpNP/None:sæmmálágátj LÁGÁSJ ; !
tjalmmebelak+CmpNP/None:tjalmmebelag9 AGAdj ; !
tjoajvak+CmpNP/Last:tjoajvag9 AGAdj ; !
tjuosek+CmpNP/Last:tjuoseg9 AGAdj ; !
tjuovggisvuoptak+CmpNP/None:tjuovggisvuoptag9 AGAdj ; !
tjáhppisvuoptak+CmpNP/None:tjáhppisvuoptag9 AGAdj ; !
tjåjvak+CmpNP/Last:tjåjvag9 AGAdj ; !
tjårvak+CmpNP/Last:tjårvag9 AGAdj ; !
tsåhkevigák+CmpNP/None:tsåhke#vigág9 AGAdj ; !
udnásj+CmpNP/None:udnátj LÁGÁSJ ;
umasselágásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth:umasslágátj LÁGÁSJ ; ! ungram
umasselágásj+CmpNP/None:umasselágátj LÁGÁSJ ; ! ungram
unnasjattuk+CmpNP/None:unnasjattug9 AGAdj ; !
unnessjattuk+CmpNP/None:unnessjattug9 AGAdj ; !
vielguk+CmpNP/Last:vielgug9 AGAdj ; !
vuonnak+CmpNP/Last:vuonnag9  AGAdj ; !
vuossteháguk+CmpNP/None:vuosstehágug9 AGAdj ; !
vuosstemielak+CmpNP/None:vuosstemielag9 AGAdj ; !
vuostasjgielak+CmpNP/None:vuostasjgielak AGAdj ;
váduk+CmpNP/None:vádug9 AGAdj ; !
vájmuk+CmpNP/Last:vájmug9 AGAdj ; !
álggodålusj+CmpNP/None:álggo#dålutj LÁGÁSJ ;
álmmuktjerdak+CmpNP/None:álmmuktjerdag9 AGAdj ;
árvuk+CmpNP/Last:árvug9 AGAdj ; !
ållessjattuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ållessjattug9 AGAdj ; !
